Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Article 3.2. Perpetual Care Funds, Preneed Burial Contracts and Consumer Protections.

§§ 57-35.11 through 57-35.35.
Repealed by Acts 1998, cc. 708 and 721, effective July 1, 2000.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, cc. 708 and 721, cl. 5
provide: “That the provisions of Article 3.2 (§

57-35.11

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 57 shall remain in effect until July 1, 2000, when the Cemetery Board shall regulate cemetery companies and implement its regulations in accordance with Chapter 23.1 (§

54.1-2310

et seq.) of Title 54.1.”